Washington statutes.
RCW 29B.50.080

Reports by employers of registered lobbyists, other persons. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

(1) Every employer of a lobbyist registered under this title during the preceding calendar year and every person other than an individual who made contributions aggregating to more than *sixteen thousand dollars or independent expenditures aggregating to more than *eight hundred dollars during the preceding calendar year shall file with the commission on or before the last day of February of each year a statement disclosing for the preceding calendar year the following information:

(a) The name of each state elected official and the name of each candidate for state office who was elected to the office and any member of the immediate family of those persons to whom the person reporting has paid any compensation in the amount of eight hundred dollars or more during the preceding calendar year for personal employment or professional services, including professional services rendered by a corporation, partnership, joint venture, association, union, or other entity in which the person holds any office, directorship, or any general partnership interest, or an ownership interest of 10 percent or more, the value of the compensation in accordance with the reporting provisions set out in RCW 29B.55.030(3), and the consideration given or performed in exchange for the compensation.

(b) The name of each state elected official, successful candidate for state office, or members of the official's or candidate's immediate family to whom the person reporting made expenditures, directly or indirectly, either through a lobbyist or otherwise, the amount of the expenditures and the purpose for the expenditures. For the purposes of this subsection, "expenditure" shall not include any expenditure made by the employer in the ordinary course of business if the expenditure is not made for the purpose of influencing, honoring, or benefiting the elected official, successful candidate, or member of his immediate family, as an elected official or candidate.

(c) The total expenditures made by the person reporting for lobbying purposes, whether through or on behalf of a registered lobbyist or otherwise.

(d) All contributions made to a political committee supporting or opposing a candidate for state office, or to a political committee supporting or opposing a statewide ballot proposition. Such contributions shall be identified by the name and the address of the recipient and the aggregate amount contributed to each such recipient.

(e) The name and address of each registered lobbyist employed by the person reporting and the total expenditures made by the person reporting for each lobbyist for lobbying purposes.

(f) The names, offices sought, and party affiliations of candidates for state offices supported or opposed by independent expenditures of the person reporting and the amount of each such expenditure.

(g) The identifying proposition number and a brief description of any statewide ballot proposition supported or opposed by expenditures not reported under (d) of this subsection and the amount of each such expenditure.

(h) Any other information the commission prescribes by rule.

(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, an employer of a lobbyist registered under this title shall file a special report with the commission if the employer makes a contribution or contributions aggregating more than one hundred dollars in a calendar month to any one of the following: A candidate, elected official, officer or employee of an agency, or political committee. The report shall identify the date and amount of each such contribution and the name of the candidate, elected official, agency officer or employee, or political committee receiving the contribution or to be benefited by the contribution. The report shall be filed on a form prescribed by the commission and shall be filed within 15 days after the last day of the calendar month during which the contribution was made.

(b) The provisions of (a) of this subsection do not apply to a contribution that is made through a registered lobbyist and reportable under RCW 29B.40.080.

[ 2024 c 164 s 480; 2019 c 428 s 33; 2010 c 204 s 807; 1993 c 2 s 27 (Initiative Measure No. 134, approved November 3, 1992); 1990 c 139 s 4; 1987 c 423 s 2; 1984 c 34 s 6; 1975 1st ex.s. c 294 s 11; 1973 c 1 s 18 (Initiative Measure No. 276, approved November 7, 1972). Formerly RCW 42.17A.630, 42.17.180.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The dollar amounts in this section may have been adjusted for inflation by rule of the commission adopted under the authority of RCW 29B.20.050. For current dollar amounts, see WAC 390-05-400 and 390-20-150.

Intent—Construction—Rules remain valid—Effective date—2024 c 164: See notes following RCW 29B.10.010.

Finding—Effective date—2019 c 428: See notes following RCW 29B.20.110.

Effective date—2010 c 204 ss 101-504, 506-601, 603-702, and 801-1103: See note following RCW 29B.15.010.

Short title—1993 c 2: See note following RCW 29B.40.010.

Legislative intent—1990 c 139: See note following RCW 29B.50.100.

Effective date—Construction—1973 c 1: See notes following RCW 29B.05.010.